Maryland, session 2026, HB1228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
4–209.
(a) This section does not apply to:
(1) premiums on lawfully procured surplus lines insurance;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1228*

HOUSE BILL 1228
(2) premiums on independently procured insurance on which a tax has
been paid under § 4–211 of this subtitle; [or]
(3) PREMIUMS ON LAWFULLY PROCURED CAPTIVE INSURANCE BY:
(I) A NONPROFIT HEALTH CARE SYSTEM LOCATED IN THE
STATE, INCLUDING PREMIUMS PAID BY THE SYSTEM’S PARENT ENTITY, ANY
SUBSIDIARY ENTITY, OR ANY CONSTITUENT HEALTH CARE PROVIDER; OR
(II) A NONPROFIT HOSPITAL LOCATED IN THE STATE; OR
(4) wet marine and transportation insurance.
(b) (1) If an unauthorized insurer effects, continues, or renews insurance on a
subject resident, located, or to be performed in the State, the unauthorized insurer shall
pay to the Commissioner, before March 1 of the next calendar year, a premium receipts tax
of 3% of gross premiums charged for the insurance.
(2) For policies effective before July 21, 2011:
(i) if the policy covers property, risks, or exposures located or to be
performed entirely in the State, the premium receipts tax shall be computed on the entire
premium at the rate specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection; and
(ii) if the policy covers property, risks, or exposures located or to be
performed both in and outside the State, the premium receipts tax shall be computed at the
rate specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection only on that portion of the premium that
is properly allocable to the risks located in the State.
(3) For policies effective on or after July 21, 2011, if the State is the
insured’s home state, the premium receipts tax shall be computed on the entire premium
at the rate specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(4) Insurance that an unauthorized insurer effects, continues, or renews on
a subject resident, located, or to be performed in the State that is procured through
negotiations or an application wholly or partly occurring or made in or from within or
outside of the State, or for which premiums wholly or partly are remitted directly or
indirectly from in or outside of the State, is deemed to be insurance procured, continued, or
renewed in the State.
(c) The premium receipts tax under this section is instead of all other State taxes.
(d) If an unauthorized insurer defaults on the payment of the tax under this
section, the insured shall pay the tax.

HOUSE BILL 1228 3
(e) If the tax is not timely paid under subsection (b) of this section, the amount of
the tax due shall be increased by a penalty of:
(1) 25% of the tax due; and
(2) an amount computed at the rate of 1% per month or any part of a month
after the date the payment was due to the date the payment is made.
4–211.
(a) This section does not apply to:
(1) PREMIUMS ON LAWFULLY PROCURED CAPTIVE INSURANCE BY:
(I) A NONPROFIT HEALTH CARE SYSTEM LOCATED IN THE
STATE, INCLUDING PREMIUMS PAID BY THE SYSTEM’S PARENT ENTITY, ANY
SUBSIDIARY ENTITY, OR ANY CONSTITUENT HEALTH CARE PROVIDER; OR
(II) A NONPROFIT HOSPITAL LOCATED IN THE STATE; OR
(2) wet marine and transportation insurance.
(b) (1) If an insured procures, continues, or renews insurance from an
unauthorized insurer that is subject to a report under § 4–210 of this subtitle, a premium
receipts tax of 3% of the gross premiums charged for the insurance is levied on the
obligation, chose in action, or right represented by the premium charged for the insurance.
(2) If an insurance contract subject to the tax is canceled and rewritten, the
additional premium, for purposes of the premium receipts tax, is the premium in excess of
the unearned premium of the canceled insurance contract.
(c) If the insured fails to withhold from the premium the amount of the tax levied
under this section, the insured is liable for the amount of the tax imposed under subsection
(b) of this section and shall pay the tax to the Commissioner.
(d) If the tax imposed under subsection (b) of this section is not timely paid, the
amount of the tax due shall be increased by a penalty of:
(1) 25% of the tax due; and
(2) an amount computed at the rate of 1% per month or part of a month
after the date the payment is due until the date the payment is made.
(e) If the tax is not timely paid under this section, on request of the Commissioner,
the Attorney General shall proceed in a court of this State or another state or in a federal
court or agency to recover the tax.

HOUSE BILL 1228
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Insurance
Administration may not charge or collect the premium receipts tax under § 4–209 or §
4–211 of the Insurance Article otherwise payable before the effective date of this Act or a
fee, penalty, or interest accrued for failure to pay that tax before the effective date of this
Act from an unauthorized insurer exempt from the tax under § 4–209(a)(3) of the Insurance
Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, or an insured exempt from the tax under §
4–211(a)(1) of the Insurance Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.